New York, session 2025-2026, S9501.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 14 of section 396-z of the general business 2 law, as amended by chapter 109 of the laws of 2018, is amended to read 3 as follows: 4 14. (a) (i) A renter may not continue custody of a rental vehicle 5 beyond the period set forth in the rental agreement unless the rental 6 vehicle company has expressly consented to extend such period. 7 (ii) A rental vehicle company is authorized to regain custody of a 8 rental vehicle registered to such company subject to the procedures set 9 forth in subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph where: 10 (1) A renter having custody of a vehicle pursuant to a rental agree- 11 ment specifying that such vehicle is to be returned to the rental vehi- 12 cle company at a certain date and time: 13 (A) intentionally retains custody of the vehicle, without the express 14 consent of the rental vehicle company, and continues such custody for a 15 period of more than twenty-four hours after the renter has been notified 16 that the vehicle is possessed beyond the period specified in the rental 17 agreement and must be returned immediately to the rental vehicle compa- 18 ny; 19 (B) obtains custody of the vehicle through materially false or fraudu- 20 lent pretenses, representations, or promises, including but not limited 21 to the use of another person's personal identifying information as 22 defined in section 190.77 of the penal law; or 23 (C) fails to remit payment in accordance with the rental agreement 24 after notification of arrears by the rental vehicle company; or 25 (2) The rental vehicle company has been notified by a law enforcement 26 agency that the vehicle is being used or has been used in furtherance of 27 criminal activity. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14256-05-6 S. 9501 2 1 (iii) In the event a renter has engaged in any of the activities set 2 forth in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, subject to the notice 3 provisions established herein, a rental vehicle company is authorized to 4 recover its vehicle in accordance with standard business practices and 5 article 2-A of the uniform commercial code. Prior to taking any such 6 action, the rental vehicle company shall notify the renter at the 7 contact information provided by the renter and afford the renter with 8 the opportunity to either return the vehicle or, subject to the consent 9 of the rental vehicle company, extend the rental period. If the renter 10 does not respond to such notice or return the vehicle within twenty-four 11 hours of such notification, the rental vehicle company may take such 12 action consistent with standard business practices and article 2-A of 13 the uniform commercial code to locate and regain custody of the vehicle. 14 All attempts to notify the renter of the unauthorized use of the rental 15 vehicle shall be documented and maintained by the rental vehicle company 16 for sixty days after the vehicle has been returned or recovered or long- 17 er in the discretion of the rental vehicle company or required by an 18 arbitrator or court of law. 19 (b) An authorized driver shall provide notice to the rental vehicle 20 company and law enforcement agency within twelve hours of learning of 21 the theft of the rental vehicle. 22 (c) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 165.05 of the penal law, 23 when a rental vehicle company has exhausted the remedies prescribed 24 herein to regain possession of a vehicle pursuant to this subdivision, 25 it may report the vehicle stolen to the appropriate law enforcement 26 agency. 27 § 2. Subdivision 14 of section 396-z of the general business law, as 28 amended by chapter 731 of the laws of 2006, is amended to read as 29 follows: 30 14. (a) (i) A renter may not continue custody of a rental vehicle 31 beyond the period set forth in the rental agreement unless the rental 32 vehicle company has expressly consented to extend such period. 33 (ii) A rental vehicle company is authorized to regain custody of a 34 rental vehicle registered to such company subject to the procedures set 35 forth in subparagraph (iv) of this paragraph where: 36 (1) A renter having custody of a vehicle pursuant to a rental agree- 37 ment specifying that such vehicle is to be returned to the rental vehi- 38 cle company at a certain date and time: 39 (A) intentionally retains custody of the vehicle, without the express 40 consent of the rental vehicle company, and continues such custody for a 41 period of more than twenty-four hours after the renter has been notified 42 that the vehicle is possessed beyond the period specified in the rental 43 agreement and must be returned immediately to the rental vehicle compa- 44 ny; 45 (B) obtains custody of the vehicle through materially false or fraudu- 46 lent pretenses, representations, or promises, including but not limited 47 to the use of another person's personal identifying information as 48 defined in section 190.77 of the penal law; or 49 (C) fails to remit payment in accordance with the terms of the rental 50 agreement after notification of arrears by the rental vehicle company; 51 or 52 (iii) The rental vehicle company has been notified by a law enforce- 53 ment agency that the vehicle is being used or has been used in further- 54 ance of criminal activity. 55 (iv) In the event a renter has engaged in any of the activities set 56 forth in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, subject to the notice S. 9501 3 1 provisions established herein, a rental vehicle company is authorized to 2 recover its vehicle in accordance with standard business practices and 3 article 2-A of the uniform commercial code. Prior to taking any such 4 action, the rental vehicle company shall notify the renter at the 5 contact information provided by the renter and afford the renter with 6 the opportunity to either return the vehicle or, subject to the consent 7 of the rental vehicle company, extend the rental period. If the renter 8 does not respond to such notice or return the vehicle within twenty-four 9 hours of such notification, the rental vehicle company may take such 10 action consistent with standard business practices and article 2-A of 11 the uniform commercial code to locate and regain custody of the vehicle. 12 All attempts to notify the renter of the unauthorized use of the rental 13 vehicle shall be documented and maintained by the rental vehicle company 14 for sixty days after the vehicle has been returned or recovered or long- 15 er in the discretion of the rental vehicle company or required by an 16 arbitrator or court of law. 17 (b) An authorized driver shall provide notice to the rental vehicle 18 company or law enforcement agency within twelve hours of learning of the 19 theft of the rental vehicle. 20 (c) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 165.05 of the penal law, 21 when a rental vehicle company has exhausted the remedies prescribed 22 herein to regain possession of a vehicle pursuant to this subdivision, 23 it may report the vehicle stolen to the appropriate law enforcement 24 agency. 25 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately, provided that the amend- 26 ments to section 396-z of the general business law, made by section one 27 of this act, shall be subject to the expiration and reversion of such 28 section pursuant to subdivision (a) of section 4 of chapter 109 of the 29 laws of 2018, as amended, when upon such date section two of this act 30 shall take effect.